Florida, session 2026, HB551.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (4) of section 381.00321, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
381.00321 The right of medical conscience of health care
providers and health care payors.—
(4) ENFORCEMENT.—A health care provider or health care
payor may file a complaint with the Attorney General alleging
any violation of this section.
(a) If the Attorney General determines there has been a
violation of this section, the Attorney General may commence a
civil action for damages, injunctive relief, or any other
appropriate relief, including attorney fees. For the purpose of
conducting an investigation, the Attorney General may administer
oaths; take depositions; make inspections when authorized by
law; issue subpoenas supported by affidavit; serve subpoenas and
other process; and compel the attendance of witnesses and the
production of books, papers, documents, and other evidence. The
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb551-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 551 2026
Department of Legal Affairs may adopt rules to implement this
subsection.
(b) If the Attorney General does not commence a civil
action within 180 days of the filing of the complaint, a health
care provider or health care payor may commence a civil action
for damages, injunctive relief, or any other appropriate relief,
including attorney fees, or assert a violation of this section
as a defense in a judicial or administrative proceeding.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb551-00